Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Office of Consumer Affairs.

§§ 3.2-113 through 3.2-115.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 24, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-113

, pertaining to the Office of Consumer Affairs, derived from Acts 1970, c. 777, § 3.1-18.1; 1978, cc. 219, 396; 2008, c. 860. Former § 3.2-114, pertaining to powers and duties of Office of Consumer Affairs, derived from Acts 1970, c. 777, § 3.1-18.2; 1978, c. 219; 1986, c. 30; 1995, c. 703; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835.
Former § 3.2-115, pertaining to payment of expenses of Office of Consumer Affairs, derived from Acts 1970, c. 777, § 3.1-18.3; 1978, c. 219; 2008, c. 860.